Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 4
RECORDS, REPORTING, AND INFORMATION

11-109-401. Acquisition of majority control over an existing trust company - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context other requires:

"Controlling person" means a person who is in control of a trust company or would be in control of a trust company after the proposed acquisition.

A person shall be deemed to have acquired control of a trust company if as a result of acquisition such person:

Directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting stock thereof;

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors thereof; or

Exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies thereof.

Whenever a person proposes to acquire control of any trust company, such person shall first make application to the banking board for approval. Without approval from the banking board pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, a person shall be prohibited from making such an acquisition.

An application required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall contain the following information to the extent that it is known by the person making the application:

The number of shares involved;

The name of each seller or transferor;

The name of each purchaser or transferee;

The name of each beneficial owner if the share or shares are registered in another name;

The purchase price;

Detailed information concerning any loans made in connection with the acquisition;

Such other information concerning the transaction as may be required by the banking board regarding the effect of the transaction upon the control of the trust company involved;

Biographical and financial information concerning each purchaser, controlling person, or person in control of a controlling person participating in the proposed acquisition; and

The name of each controlling person and each person in control of a controlling person participating in the proposed acquisition.

After receipt of an application, the banking board shall make an investigation, and the banking board shall approve the change of control only after the banking board has determined:

(I) That the person proposing to acquire control is qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to control the trust company in a legal and proper manner;

(II) That the interests of the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed acquisition; and

(III) That the person proposing to acquire control has satisfied the requirements of this section and the other provisions of this article.

The general assembly declares that the acquisition of control of or of any ownership interest in trust companies by persons owned or controlled by a country with which it has been determined to be against the national interest to trade without export controls for national security purposes by the president of the United States or another appropriate agency of the federal government as directed by the president pursuant to the "Export Administration Act of 1979", 50 U.S.C. Appendix sec. 2401 et seq., as amended, the "International Emergency Economic Powers Act", 50 U.S.C. sec. 1701 et seq., as amended, or any rule, order, or decision promulgated in connection therewith, is against the public interest. If the application or the banking board's investigation indicates that any person seeking to have control of or any ownership interest in a trust company is owned or controlled by such a country, the banking board may not approve any such change of control.

This section shall not apply to the acquisition of:

Voting proxies acquired in the normal course of business as a result of a proxy solicitation in conjunction with a stockholders' meeting;

Stock held in a fiduciary capacity unless the acquiring person has sole discretionary authority to exercise voting rights with respect thereto;

Stock acquired in securing or collecting, in whole or in part, a debt contracted in good faith or stock acquired through testate or intestate succession or bona fide gift, if the acquirer advises the banking board of such acquisition within thirty days after the acquisition and provides any information required or requested by the banking board or commissioner;

Stock acquired by an underwriter in good faith and without any intent to evade the purpose of this section if the shares are held only for such reasonable period of time as will permit the sale thereof; or

Pro rata stock dividends.

If the banking board has not acted upon a completed application within sixty days after receipt thereof, the time may be extended for an additional thirty days by the banking board.

Whenever any person proposes to acquire control of any trust company and is required by the "Change in Bank Control Act of 1978" (section 7 (j) of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act", 12 U.S.C. 1817 (j)), as amended, to give the appropriate federal banking agency prior written notice of such proposed acquisition, a copy of such notice with supporting information shall be given concurrently to the banking board for information. The banking board may use such information in evaluating applications submitted pursuant to this section and shall submit its recommendation and comments to the appropriate federal regulatory authority in a timely manner.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1188, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-115 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-402. Reports to the banking board and to the commissioner.

The board of directors shall cause the financial statements of the trust company to be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, except as the banking board may otherwise provide in order to establish regulatory and competitive parity and pursuant to the policies expressed in section 11-101-102.

The board of directors shall cause an annual audit of the trust company to be completed by an accounting firm composed of certified public accountants or a directors' examination by a public accountant or any other independent person or persons as determined by the banking board at least annually but at intervals of not more than fifteen months as may be required by the banking board or its rules. The banking board shall adopt rules regarding the qualifications of such public accountant and other independent person or persons who shall assume the responsibility for due care in such directors' examinations. The banking board's rules shall also establish the scope of such directors' examinations, which shall include safeguards to insure that such examinations adequately describe the financial condition of the financial institution. The banking board may require an audit to be completed by an accounting firm composed of certified public accountants under certain circumstances. A report of the audit or directors' examination and any related management letters and documents shall be completed and submitted to the banking board within the time frames, in the form, and containing such information as the banking board may require in its rules. Such report of the audit or directors' examination and any related management letters and documents shall be reviewed by the directors at the next meeting of the board of directors.

If a trust company is owned or controlled by a bank holding company, the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may be fulfilled if:

As required by the banking board and its rules, the controlling bank holding company is audited or examined in a directors' examination annually at intervals of not more than fifteen months and the trust company is included in the annual audit or directors' examination of the bank holding company by that firm;

A report of the audit or directors' examination for the controlling bank holding company, and any related management letters and documents, is completed and submitted to the banking board within the time frames, in the form, and containing such information as the banking board may require in its rules; and

An annual internal examination of the trust company is prepared by the internal examination staff of the controlling bank holding company, which shall be submitted to the banking board immediately upon its request.

Every trust company shall make and file with the commissioner not less than three reports during each calendar year according to the form that may be prescribed by him, verified by the oath of either the president, the vice-president, the cashier, or the secretary and attested by the signature of three or more of the directors. Each such report shall exhibit in detail, as may be required by the commissioner, the resources and liabilities of the trust company at the close of business on the date specified by the commissioner.

Such reports shall be transmitted to the commissioner within thirty days after the request therefor.

The commissioner has power to call for special reports from any particular trust company if, in the commissioner's judgment, such reports are necessary to a full and complete knowledge of its condition. No such special report, nor any summary thereof, shall be required to be published. The reports required by, and filed pursuant to, this section shall be in lieu of all others required by law from trust companies. Every trust company that fails to comply with this section shall pay to the commissioner a penalty in an amount set by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 for each day's delay. The commissioner, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

Any person who becomes a director, executive officer, or other person who, directly or indirectly, is responsible for the management, control, or operations of a trust company shall within ninety days thereafter file a report with the banking board containing: A statement describing any civil or criminal offenses affecting such person's qualification to serve in such capacity with respect to which such person has been found guilty or liable by any federal or state court or federal or state regulatory agency; such biographical information as the banking board shall require; and such other information as the banking board shall require pursuant to its rules. If any statement contained in such report subsequently becomes inaccurate or misleading in any way, such person shall file an amended report within thirty days after the date on which the statement in the report first becomes inaccurate or misleading. Any person who fails to comply with this subsection (5) shall be required by the banking board to pay a penalty in an amount set by the banking board by rule, which shall not exceed twenty-five dollars per day, and such penalties shall be deposited in the general fund. The banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

If any trust company changes any executive officer, director, or other person who, directly or indirectly, is responsible for the management, control, or operations of the trust company, such changes shall be promptly reported to the banking board, and the trust company shall provide such information concerning such person as may be requested by the banking board on such forms as the banking board may require, including information about the reasons for termination from any prior employment and whether such person was charged or convicted of any civil or criminal offenses enumerated in subsection (5) of this section. No civil liability shall arise for any trust company, its directors, executive officers, employees, or agents, or any other persons due to compliance with the requirements of this subsection (6). The purpose of such information is to inform the banking board of the qualifications of such person as they may affect the safety and soundness of the trust company. The information shall be treated as confidential under this article. Any trust company that fails to comply with this subsection (6) shall be required by the banking board to pay a penalty in an amount set by the banking board by rule, which shall not exceed twenty-five dollars per day, and such penalties shall be deposited in the general fund. The banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-118 as it existed prior to 2003.